lv/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lv_LV.aff
SFX F Y 296
SFX F  āt  u    [^j]āt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  āt  i    [^j]āt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  āt  a    [^jd]āt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  āt  ām   [^jd]āt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  āt  ot   [^j]āt   is:0xtta
SFX F  āt  iet  [^j]āt   is:2dttp
SFX F  āt  a/]| [^jd]āt   is:0xttv
SFX F  āt  0    [eu]dāt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  āt  am   [eu]dāt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  āt  at   [eu]dāt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  āt  0/]| [eu]dāt   is:0xttv
SFX F  ēt  u     [^cl]ēt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  ēt  i     [^cl]ēt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  ēt  0     [^cl]ēt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  ēt  am    [^cl]ēt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  ēt  at    [^cl]ēt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  ēt  iet   [^cl]ēt   is:2dttp
SFX F  ēt  ot    [^cl]ēt   is:0xtta
SFX F  ēt  0/]|  [^cl]ēt   is:0xttv
SFX F  lēt  ļu   [u]lēt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  lēt  li   [u]lēt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  lēt  ļ    [u]lēt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  lēt  ļam  [u]lēt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  lēt  ļat  [u]lēt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  lēt  liet [u]lēt   is:2dttp
SFX F  lēt  ļot  [u]lēt   is:0xtta
SFX F  lēt  ļ/]| [u]lēt   is:0xttv
SFX F  ēt  u     [^u]lēt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  ēt  i     [^u]lēt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  ēt  0     [^u]lēt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  ēt  am    [^u]lēt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  ēt  at    [^u]lēt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  ēt  iet   [^u]lēt   is:2dttp
SFX F  ēt  ot    [^u]lēt   is:0xtta
SFX F  ēt  0/]|  [^u]lēt   is:0xttv
SFX F  ēt  u     [^āe]cēt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  ēt  i     [^āe]cēt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  ēt  0     [^āe]cēt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  ēt  am    [^āe]cēt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  ēt  at    [^āe]cēt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  ēt  iet   [^āe]cēt   is:2dttp
SFX F  ēt  ot    [^āe]cēt   is:0xtta
SFX F  ēt  0/]|  [^āe]cēt   is:0xttv
SFX F  cēt ku     [ā]cēt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  cēt ki     [ā]cēt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  cēt k      [ā]cēt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  cēt kam    [ā]cēt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  cēt kat    [ā]cēt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  cēt kiet   [ā]cēt   is:2dttp
SFX F  cēt kot    [ā]cēt   is:0xtta
SFX F  cēt k/]|   [ā]cēt   is:0xttv
SFX F  ēt  u     [^t]ecēt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  ēt  i     [^t]ecēt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  ēt  0     [^t]ecēt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  ēt  am    [^t]ecēt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  ēt  at    [^t]ecēt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  ēt  iet   [^t]ecēt   is:2dttp
SFX F  ēt  ot    [^t]ecēt   is:0xtta
SFX F  ēt  0/]|  [^t]ecēt   is:0xttv
SFX F  cēt ku     [t]ecēt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  ēt  i      [t]ecēt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  cēt k      [t]ecēt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  cēt kam    [t]ecēt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  cēt kat    [t]ecēt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  cēt kiet   [t]ecēt   is:2dttp
SFX F  cēt kot    [t]ecēt   is:0xtta
SFX F  cēt k/]|   [t]ecēt   is:0xttv
SFX F  īt  u    [^cz]īt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  īt  i    [^cz]īt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  īt  a    [^cz]īt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  īt  ām   [^cz]īt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  īt  āt   [^cz]īt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  īt  iet  [^cz]īt   is:2dttp
SFX F  īt  ot   [^cz]īt   is:0xtta
SFX F  īt  a/]| [^cz]īt   is:0xttv
SFX F  cīt ku    [^āīr]cīt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  cīt ki    [^āīr]cīt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  cīt ka    [^āīr]cīt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  cīt kām   [^āīr]cīt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  cīt kāt   [^āīr]cīt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  cīt kiet  [^āīr]cīt   is:2dttp
SFX F  cīt kot   [^āīr]cīt   is:0xtta
SFX F  cīt ka/]| [^āīr]cīt   is:0xttv
SFX F  īt  u    [āīr]cīt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  īt  i    [āīr]cīt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  īt  a    [āīr]cīt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  īt  ām   [āīr]cīt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  īt  āt   [āīr]cīt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  īt  iet  [āīr]cīt   is:2dttp
SFX F  īt  ot   [āīr]cīt   is:0xtta
SFX F  īt  a/]| [āīr]cīt   is:0xttv
SFX F  īt  u    [^d]zīt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  īt  i    [^d]zīt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  īt  a    [^d]zīt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  īt  ām   [^d]zīt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  īt  āt   [^d]zīt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  īt  iet  [^d]zīt   is:2dttp
SFX F  īt  ot   [^d]zīt   is:0xtta
SFX F  īt  a/]| [^d]zīt   is:0xttv
SFX F  dzīt gu   [d]zīt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  dzīt gi   [d]zīt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  dzīt ga   [d]zīt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  dzīt gām  [d]zīt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  dzīt gāt  [d]zīt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  dzīt giet [d]zīt   is:2dttp
SFX F  dzīt got  [d]zīt   is:0xtta
SFX F  dzīt ga/]| [d]zīt  is:0xttv
SFX F  t   stu   [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:1vtt0
SFX F  t   sti   [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:2vtt0
SFX F  t   st    [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:3xtt0
SFX F  t   stam  [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:1dtt0
SFX F  t   stat  [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:2dtt0
SFX F  t   stot  [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:0xtta
SFX F  t   stiet [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:2dttp
SFX F  t   st/]| [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:0xttv
SFX F  0   u    [z]t   is:1vtt0
SFX F  0   i    [z]t   is:2vtt0
SFX F  0   am   [z]t   is:1dtt0
SFX F  0   at   [z]t   is:2dtt0
SFX F  0   ot   [z]t   is:0xtta
SFX F  0   iet  [z]t   is:2dttp
SFX F  0   0/]| [z]t   is:0xttv
SFX F  0   u    [^i]rst   is:1vtt0
SFX F  0   i    [^i]rst   is:2vtt0
SFX F  0   am   [^i]rst   is:1dtt0
SFX F  0   at   [^i]rst   is:2dtt0
SFX F  0   ot   [^i]rst   is:0xtta
SFX F  0   iet  [^i]rst   is:2dttp
SFX F  0   0/]| [^i]rst   is:0xttv
SFX F  st  du    [eē]st   is:1vtt0
SFX F  st  d     [eē]st   is:0vtt0
SFX F  st  dam   [eē]st   is:1dtt0
SFX F  st  dat   [eē]st   is:2dtt0
SFX F  st  dot   [eē]st   is:0xtta
SFX F  st  diet  [eē]st   is:2dttp
SFX F  st  d/]|  [eē]st   is:0xttv
SFX F  0   u    ust   is:1vtt0
SFX F  0   i    ust   is:2vtt0
SFX F  0   am   ust   is:1dtt0
SFX F  0   at   ust   is:2dtt0
SFX F  0   ot   ust   is:0xtta
SFX F  0   iet  ust   is:2dttp
SFX F  0   0/]| ust   is:0xttv
SFX F  0   u    [īlm]st   is:1vtt0
SFX F  0   i    [īlm]st   is:2vtt0
SFX F  0   am   [īlm]st   is:1dtt0
SFX F  0   at   [īlm]st   is:2dtt0
SFX F  0   ot   [īlm]st   is:0xtta
SFX F  0   iet  [īlm]st   is:2dttp
SFX F  0   0/]| [īlm]st   is:0xttv
SFX F  irst ērtu   [c]irst   is:1vtt0
SFX F  irst ērt    [c]irst   is:2vtt0
SFX F  irst ērtam  [c]irst   is:1dtt0
SFX F  irst ērtat  [c]irst   is:2dtt0
SFX F  irst ērtot  [c]irst   is:0xtta
SFX F  irst ērtiet [c]irst   is:2dttp
SFX F  irst ērt/]| [c]irst   is:0xttv
SFX F  0   u     [mv]irst   is:1vtt0
SFX F  0   i     [mv]irst   is:2vtt0
SFX F  0   am    [mv]irst   is:1dtt0
SFX F  0   at    [mv]irst   is:2dtt0
SFX F  0   ot    [mv]irst   is:0xtta
SFX F  0   iet   [mv]irst   is:2dttp
SFX F  0   0/]|  [mv]irst   is:0xttv
SFX F  0   u    [^z]ist   is:1vtt0
SFX F  0   i    [^z]ist   is:2vtt0
SFX F  0   am   [^z]ist   is:1dtt0
SFX F  0   at   [^z]ist   is:2dtt0
SFX F  0   ot   [^z]ist   is:0xtta
SFX F  0   iet  [^z]ist   is:2dttp
SFX F  0   0/]| [^z]ist   is:0xttv
SFX F  st  estu    [z]ist   is:1vtt0
SFX F  st  esti    [z]ist   is:2vtt0
SFX F  st  est     [z]ist   is:3xtt0
SFX F  st  estam   [z]ist   is:1dtt0
SFX F  st  estat   [z]ist   is:2dtt0
SFX F  st  estot   [z]ist   is:0xtta
SFX F  st  estiet  [z]ist   is:2dttp
SFX F  st  est/]|  [z]ist   is:0xttv
SFX F  gt  egu    igt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  gt  edz    igt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  gt  eg     igt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  gt  egam   igt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  gt  egat   igt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  gt  edziet igt   is:2dttp
SFX F  gt  egot   igt   is:0xtta
SFX F  gt  eg/]|  igt   is:0xttv
SFX F  agt ogu     agt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  agt odz     agt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  agt og      agt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  agt ogam    agt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  agt ogat    agt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  agt odziet  agt   is:2dttp
SFX F  agt ogot    agt   is:0xtta
SFX F  agt og/]|   agt   is:0xttv
SFX F  t   stu   [^aiulr]kt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  t   sti   [^aiulr]kt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  t   st    [^aiulr]kt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  t   stam  [^aiulr]kt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  t   stat  [^aiulr]kt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  t   stot  [^aiulr]kt   is:0xtta
SFX F  t   stiet [^aiulr]kt   is:2dttp
SFX F  t   st/]| [^aiulr]kt   is:0xttv
SFX F  akt  oku   akt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  akt  oc    akt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  akt  ok    akt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  akt  okam  akt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  akt  okat  akt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  akt  ociet akt   is:2dttp
SFX F  akt  okot  akt   is:0xtta
SFX F  akt  ok/]| akt   is:0xttv
SFX F  kt  eku     ikt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  kt  ec      ikt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  kt  ek      ikt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  kt  ekam    ikt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  kt  ekat    ikt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  kt  eciet   ikt   is:2dttp
SFX F  kt  ekot    ikt   is:0xtta
SFX F  kt  ek/]|   ikt   is:0xttv
SFX F  ukt  ūku    ukt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  ukt  ūc     ukt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  ukt  ūk     ukt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  ukt  ūkam   ukt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  ukt  ūkat   ukt   is:2dtt0
